Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB85.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5 introductory paragraph of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Unlawful Discriminatory Practices.--[It] Subject to section 5.4, it shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification, or in the case of a fraternal corporation or association, unless based upon membership in such association or corporation, or except 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 where based upon applicable security regulations established by the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania:* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.4. Unlawful Discriminatory Practices Against Certain Religions.--For purposes of section 5, with regard to the Jewish faith, unlawful discriminatory practices based on religious creed:(a) Shall include:(1) The definition of "antisemitism" adopted on May 26, 2016, by the International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance and used by the United States Department of State.(2) Contemporary examples of antisemitism identified by the International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance on the effective date of this paragraph.(b) Do not include criticism of Israel similar to that leveled against any other country.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0085PN0068 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718